Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 5. Nuisances

§ 2121.
Injunctions.

The selectboard of a town in the name and behalf of such town or the town school district therein, as the case may be, and the trustees of an incorporated village, in the name and behalf of such village, may prefer complaint for relief by injunction for the abatement of public nuisances.
The Superior Court shall have jurisdiction of such actions.

Parties.

Suit brought in name of village to abate public nuisance, alleged to have been created by moving and altering a building in violation of a village ordinance, properly so brought, as section, authorizing trustees to “prefer” bill, means that they are to bring matter to court’s attention by bill in name of village. Village of Bennington v. Hawks, 100 Vt. 37, 134 A. 638, 1926 Vt. LEXIS 117 (1926).